California statutes. Education Code
(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49301.

A school safety patrol established in any school as herein provided shall be composed of pupils attending in such school. The members of the patrol shall be under the supervision and control of a qualified employee of the district designated by the board, except as otherwise provided in Sections 1299, 49472 to 49473, inclusive, 49510 to 49517, inclusive, Article 1 (commencing with Section 49400) to Article 5 (commencing with Section 49470), inclusive, Article 8 (commencing with Section 49500) of Chapter 9 of this part, and this article. The provisions of this section shall not, however, be deemed to require the physical presence of such employee at any particular street or highway location where any such school safety patrol is functioning.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49302.

The pupils who serve as members of a school safety patrol shall be designated by the principal of the school in which the patrol is established, but no pupil shall be designated to serve on any patrol unless the pupil and the person having legal custody of such pupil consent, in writing, thereto. Upon the revocation, in writing, of the consent of either such pupil or such person, the pupil shall cease to be a member of the patrol.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49303.

The State Board of Education is hereby authorized to adopt all rules and regulations necessary to effect the purposes of this act, and the governing board of each school district is hereby authorized to adopt additional rules and regulations not inconsistent therewith governing school safety patrols established under its jurisdiction.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49304.

The members of a school safety patrol established hereunder shall be authorized and required only to give traffic signals and directions in order to assist school pupils in safely crossing streets and highways.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49305.

The chief of police in each city, and the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol in unincorporated territory, may upon the request of the governing board of any school district, cooperate in the establishment, supervision and control of a school safety patrol to such extent as may be agreed upon.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49306.

The governing board of a school district which authorizes the establishment of a school safety patrol may provide for adequate hospital and medical attention to care for any injury or disability that may be suffered by any pupil while performing any act within and arising out of his duties as a member of a school safety patrol provided, however, that no pupil shall be compelled to accept such services if his parent or guardian objects.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49307.

Any person who shall disregard any traffic signal or direction given by a member of a school safety patrol, shall be guilty of an infraction and subject to the penalties provided in subdivision (a) of Section 42001 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1978, Ch. 626.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Basic Work Station [49320. - 49320.]

49320.

A basic work station in industrial education is defined as an assigned location where a student normally spends the majority of his class time performing the operational functions necessary to meet the performance objectives and goals of the course, including industrial safety education. For these purposes, the number of students in any industrial education facility or laboratory in elementary and secondary programs shall not exceed the number of basic work stations designed for the number of students assigned, as determined by the local governing board of the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Injurious Objects [49330. - 49335.]

49330.

(a) (1) As used in this article “injurious object” shall mean those objects specified in the following sections:

(A) Section 16250 of the Penal Code.

(B) Subdivisions (a) to (d), inclusive of Section 16520 of the Penal Code.

(C) Section 16590 of the Penal Code.

(D) Section 16880 of the Penal Code.

(E) Section 17235 of the Penal Code.

(F) Section 17240 of the Penal Code.

(G) Section 17250 of the Penal Code.

(2) As used in this article, “injurious object” shall also mean objects capable of inflicting substantial bodily damage, not necessary for the academic purpose of the pupil.

(b) As used in this section, “academic purpose” means any school sponsored activity or class of instruction scheduled during the schoolday.

(c) “Injurious object” does not include any personal possessions or items of apparel which a schoolage child reasonably may be expected either to have in his or her possession or to wear.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 285, Sec. 5.   (AB 1402)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

49331.

Any certificated employee of any school district and any classified employee of a school district who is designated by the governing board for such purposes may take from the personal possession of any pupil upon school premises or while under the authority of school personnel any injurious object in the possession of the pupil.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

49332.

The parent or guardian of a pupil from whom an injurious object has been taken pursuant to this section may be notified by school personnel of the taking.

School personnel may retain protective possession of any injurious object taken pursuant to this section until the risk of its use as a weapon has dissipated, unless prior to dissipation of the risk, the parent or guardian requests that the school personnel retain the object, in which case, the school personnel shall retain the object until the parent or guardian or another adult with the written consent of the parent or guardian appears personally to take possession of the injurious object from the school personnel.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

49333.

Notwithstanding Section 49332, a pupil who brings an injurious object to school, and who presents the object to a certificated or classified employee, may have the object returned to him or her at the conclusion of the school day, provided such injurious object may be lawfully possessed off school grounds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1979, Ch. 210.)
-------------------------------------------

49334.

If a school employee initially notifies a law enforcement agency regarding a student or adult who possesses an injurious object while upon school premises or while under the authority of school personnel, the employee may not be subject to any civil or administrative proceeding, including any disciplinary action, for violation of any local policy or procedure relating to the notification of a law enforcement agency. The employee shall conform to locally adopted procedures after exercising his or her personal option to notify a law enforcement agency.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 469, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49335.

On or before April 1, 2001, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall adopt a system that will shield the identity and provide protection to pupils who report the presence of injurious objects on school campuses that offer instruction in kindergarten and any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 265, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Hazardous Materials Education [49340. - 49341.]

49340.

This article shall be known and may be cited as the California Hazardous Materials Education Act of 1982.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 785, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

49341.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares as follows:

(a) Because school science laboratories pose a potentially serious threat to the health and safety of school pupils and school personnel due to the use and storage of hazardous materials in these laboratories, educational efforts are needed to increase the awareness of persons dealing with these materials in these settings so that possible losses of life, injuries, losses of property, and social disruption, which could result from the improper and unsafe use of hazardous materials, will be minimized.

(b) Effective safety in school laboratories requires informed judgment, decisionmaking, and operating procedures by those responsible for laboratory and related instruction. It is desirable that each high school and junior high, middle, or elementary school offering laboratory work have a trained member of the professional staff who is designated as the building laboratory consultant and who is responsible for the review, updating, and carrying out of the school’s adopted procedures for laboratory safety.

(c) Efforts by state and local agencies to implement training programs designed to provide qualified individuals with the necessary information, organizational skills, and materials to assist schools and teachers in the development of their laboratory safety policies and procedures are nonexistent or inadequate, and it is necessary that this situation be remedied. The state should assume leadership through the policy and guidance of the State Department of Education in the development, support, and implementation of a statewide training program.

(d) The Legislature requests that the State Department of Education consider making this program a part of the department’s energy and environmental education program that is conducted pursuant to Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 8700) of Part 6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 22, Sec. 41.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Reporting of Missing Children [49370. - 49370.]

49370.

The Legislature hereby declares its intent in enacting this article to require that specified persons, including school teachers, school administrators, school aides, school playground workers, and school bus drivers, report missing children to a law enforcement agency in a timely manner, in order to provide those children a necessary level of protection when they are at serious risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 1013, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 7. Sexual Abuse and Sex Trafficking Prevention [49380. - 49381.]

49380.

(a) A school district is encouraged to collaborate with outside consultants, including law enforcement, with expertise in sexual abuse and sex trafficking prevention education in order to create a school safety plan to address the threat of sexual abuse and sex trafficking.

(b) A school district is encouraged to collaborate with law enforcement on a referral protocol for high-risk pupils and minors.

(c) In-service training may be conducted periodically to enable school district personnel to learn about new developments in the understanding of sexual abuse and sex trafficking, and to receive instruction on
 current prevention efforts and methods. A school district is encouraged to include training on early identification of sexual abuse and sex trafficking of pupils and minors.

(History: Added by Stats. 2014, Ch. 713, Sec. 2.   (SB 1165)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

49381.

(a) The governing board of a school district and the governing body of a charter school shall work with their schools
 that maintain any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive,
 to identify the most appropriate methods of informing parents and guardians of pupils in those grades of human trafficking prevention resources.

(b) The governing board of a school district and the governing body of a charter school shall implement the methods identified pursuant to subdivision (a) in their schools that maintain any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, by January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 848, Sec. 1.   (SB 1104)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Threats of Homicide at School [49390. - 49395.]

49390.

For purposes of this article, unless the context requires otherwise, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Law enforcement” means any of the following:

(1) A peace officer employed or contracted by a school, school district, or local educational agency for school safety purposes.

(2) A police or security department of a local educational agency.

(3) A local law enforcement agency or agencies with geographic jurisdiction
 over a local educational agency.

(b) “Local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school serving pupils in any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, as part of a middle school or high school.

(c) “Reasonable suspicion” means articulable facts, together with rational inferences from those facts, warranting an objective suspicion.

(d) “School official” means any certificated or classified employee of a local educational agency or member of the school district governing board, county board of education, or governing body of a charter school whose official duties bring the individual in contact with pupils in any of grades 6 to 12, inclusive, as part of a middle school or high school, on a
 regular basis.

(e) “Threat or perceived threat” means any writing or action of a pupil that creates a reasonable suspicion that the pupil is preparing to commit a homicidal act related to school or a school activity. This may include possession, use, or depictions of firearms, ammunition, shootings, or targets in association with infliction of physical harm, destruction, or death in a social media post, journal, class note, or other media associated with the pupil.
 It may also include a warning by a parent, pupil, or other individual.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (SB 906)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49391.

(a) (1) On or before July 1, 2023, the department shall develop model content, in consultation with relevant local educational agencies, civil rights groups, and the Department of
 Justice.

(2) The model content developed pursuant to paragraph (1) shall include, at a minimum, content that informs parents or guardians of California’s child access prevention laws and laws relating to the safe storage of firearms, including, but not limited to, Division 4 (commencing with Section 25000) of Title 4 of Part 6
 of the Penal Code.

(b) The department shall update the model content on a yearly basis as necessary to reflect any changes in law.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (SB 906)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49392.

(a) Commencing with the 2023–24 school year, and each school year thereafter, a local educational agency serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, shall, informed by the model content developed by the department pursuant to Section 49391, include in the annual notification pursuant to Section 48980,
 to the parents or guardians of pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, information related to the safe storage of firearms.

(b) For purposes of this section, “local educational agency” means a school district, county office of education, or charter school.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (SB 906)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49393.

(a) A school official who is alerted to or observes any threat or perceived threat, as described in subdivision (e) of Section 49390, shall immediately report the threat or perceived threat to law enforcement. The report shall include copies of any documentary or other evidence associated with the threat or perceived threat.

(b) When two or more school officials jointly have an obligation to report pursuant to subdivision (a), and when there is agreement among them, the report required by this section may be made by any of them in a single report. A school official who has knowledge that the designated reporting school official has failed to make the single
 report shall thereafter make the report.

(c) Law enforcement shall keep a record of any report received pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (SB 906)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49394.

(a) Upon the notification described in Section 49393, the local law enforcement agency or the schoolsite police, as described in paragraphs (1) and (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 49390, as appropriate, with the support of the local educational agency, shall immediately conduct an investigation and assessment of any threat or perceived threat described in subdivision (e) of Section 49390.

(b) The investigation and threat assessment under subdivision (a) shall include a review of the firearm registry of the Department of Justice.

(c) The investigation and threat assessment under subdivision (a)
 shall include a search conducted at the schoolsite, only if the search is justified by a reasonable suspicion that it would produce evidence related to the threat or perceived threat.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (SB 906)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

49395.

A local educational agency serving pupils in kindergarten or any of grades 1 to 12, inclusive, and a school of a local educational agency, is immune from civil liability for any damages allegedly caused by, arising out of, or relating to the requirements of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 144, Sec. 1.   (SB 906)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Pupil and Personnel Health [49400. - 49590.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Powers—School Boards [49400. - 49417.]

49400.

The governing board of any school district shall give diligent care to the health and physical development of pupils, and may employ properly certified persons for the work.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49401.5.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this section to express its concern for the health and safety of school pupils and school personnel at schools where hazardous materials are stored on the school premises, and to encourage school districts to take steps to ensure hazardous materials are properly used and stored.

(b) The governing board of any school district may request consultation services from the California Occupational Safety and Health Consultation Service to ensure hazardous materials are being used and stored safely in school laboratories.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 785, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

49402.

Contracts between any city, county, or local health district and the governing board of any school district located wholly or partially within such city, county, or local health district for the performance by the health officers or other employees of the health department of such city, county, or local health district of any or all of the functions and duties set forth in this chapter, Section 49404, and in Article 1 (commencing with Section 49300) of Chapter 8 of this part relating to health supervision of school buildings and pupils are hereby authorized.

In any such contracts the consideration shall be such as may be agreed upon by the governing board and the city, county, or local health district and shall be paid by the governing board at such times as shall be specified in the contract. This section shall not apply to any district which is under the control of a governing board which has under its control a district or districts having a total average daily attendance of 100,000 or more pupils.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49403.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, the governing board of a school district shall cooperate with the local health officer in measures necessary for the prevention and control of communicable diseases in schoolage children. For that purpose, the board may use any funds, property, and personnel of the district, and may permit a licensed physician and surgeon, or a health care practitioner listed in subdivision (b) who is acting under the direction of a supervising physician and surgeon, to administer an immunizing agent to a pupil whose parent or guardian has consented in writing to the administration of the immunizing agent.

(b) (1) The following health care
 practitioners, acting under the direction of a supervising physician and surgeon, may administer an immunizing agent within the course of a school immunization program:

(A) A physician assistant.

(B) A nurse practitioner.

(C) A registered nurse.

(D) A licensed vocational nurse.

(E) A nursing student who is acting under the supervision of a registered nurse, in accordance with applicable provisions of law.

(2) A health care practitioner’s authority to administer an immunizing agent pursuant to this subdivision is subject to the following conditions:

(A) The
 administration of an immunizing agent is upon the standing orders of a supervising physician and surgeon and in accordance with any written regulations that the State Department of Public Health may adopt.

(B) The school nurse is notified and he or she maintains control, as necessary, as supervisor of health in accordance with Sections 44871, 44877, 49422, and subdivision (a) of Section 49426.

(C) The health care practitioner may only administer immunizations for the prevention and control of any of the following:

(i) Annual seasonal influenza.

(ii) Influenza
 pandemic episodes.

(iii) Other diseases that represent a current or potential outbreak as declared by a federal, state, or local public health officer.

 (c) As used in this section, “supervising physician and surgeon” means the physician and surgeon of the local health department or school district that is directing the school immunization program.

(d) While nothing in this section shall be construed to require the physical presence of the supervising physician and surgeon, the supervising physician and surgeon shall require a health care practitioner under his or her direction to do both of the following:

(1) Satisfactorily demonstrate competence in the administration of the immunizing agent, including knowledge of all indications and contraindications
 for the administration of the agent, and the recognition and treatment of emergency reactions to the agent that constitute a danger to the health or life of the person receiving the immunization.

(2) Possess the medications and equipment that are required, in the medical judgment of the supervising physician and surgeon, to treat any emergency conditions and reactions caused by the immunizing agents that constitute a danger to the health or life of the person receiving the immunization, and to demonstrate the ability to administer the medications and use the equipment as necessary.

(e) It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage school-based immunization programs, when feasible, to use the California Immunization Registry to assist providers to track patient records, reduce missed opportunities, and to help fully immunize all children in
 California.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 203, Sec. 1.   (AB 1937)   Effective August 27, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

49405.

The control of smallpox is under the direction of the State Department of Health Services, and no rule or regulation on the subject of vaccination shall be adopted by school or local health authorities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 93.)
-------------------------------------------

49406.

(a) (1) (A) Except as provided in subdivision (j), a person shall not be initially employed by a school district, or employed under contract, in a certificated or classified position unless the person has submitted to a tuberculosis risk assessment within the past 60 days, and, if tuberculosis risk factors are identified, has been examined to determine that the person is free of infectious tuberculosis by a physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a nurse practitioner
 practicing in compliance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code. If no risk factors are identified, an examination is not required. A person who is subject to the requirements of this subdivision may submit to an examination that complies with subparagraph (B) instead of submitting to a tuberculosis risk assessment.

(B) The examination required by this subdivision shall consist of either an approved intradermal tuberculin test or any other test for tuberculosis infection that is recommended by the federal Centers for Disease Control and Prevention (CDC) and licensed by the federal Food and Drug Administration (FDA). If the test is positive, the test shall be followed by an X-ray of the lungs in accordance with subdivision (f) of Section 120115 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The X-ray may be taken by a competent and qualified X-ray technician if the X-ray is subsequently interpreted by a physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code.

(3) The district superintendent of schools or their designee may exempt, for a period not to exceed 60 days following termination of the pregnancy, a pregnant employee from the requirement that a positive test for tuberculosis infection be followed by an X-ray of the lungs.

(b) Thereafter, an employee who has no identified risk factors or who tests negative for the tuberculosis infection shall be required to undergo the tuberculosis risk assessment and, if risk factors are identified,
 the examination, at least once every four years or more often if directed by the governing board of the school district upon recommendation of the local health officer. Once an employee has a documented positive test for tuberculosis infection conducted pursuant to this subdivision that has been followed by an X-ray, the tuberculosis risk assessment is no longer required. A referral shall be made within 30 days of completion of the examination to the local health officer to determine the need for followup care.

(c) After the tuberculosis risk assessment and, if indicated, the examination, the employee shall file with the district superintendent of schools a certificate from the examining physician and surgeon, physician assistant, or nurse practitioner showing the employee was examined and found free from infectious tuberculosis. The county
 board of education may require, by rule, that the certificates be filed in the office of the county superintendent of schools or maintained in the office of the county superintendent of schools if a majority of the governing boards of the school districts within the county petition the county board of education. A school district, or school districts with a common governing board, having an average daily attendance of 60,000 or more may elect to maintain the files for its employees in that school district.

(d) As used in this section, “certificate” means a certificate signed by the examining physician and surgeon licensed under Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, a physician assistant practicing in compliance with Chapter 7.7 (commencing with Section 3500) of Division 2 of the Business
 and Professions Code, or a nurse practitioner practicing in compliance with Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 2700) of Division 2 of the Business and Professions Code, or a notice from a public health agency that indicates freedom from infectious tuberculosis. The latter, regardless of form, shall constitute evidence of compliance with this section.

(e) Nothing in this section shall prevent the governing board of a school district, upon recommendation of the local health officer, from establishing a rule requiring a more extensive or more frequent physical examination than required by this section. The rule shall provide for reimbursement on the same basis as required in this section.

(f) The tuberculosis risk assessment and, if indicated, the examination is a condition of
 initial employment and the expense shall be borne by the applicant unless otherwise provided by rules of the governing board of the school district. However, the governing board of a school district may, if an applicant is accepted for employment, reimburse that person in a like manner prescribed in this section for employees.

(g) The governing board of a school district shall reimburse the employee for the cost, if any, of the tuberculosis risk assessment and the examination. The governing board of a school district may provide for the tuberculosis risk assessment and examination required by this section or may establish a reasonable fee for the examination that is reimbursable to employees of the school district complying with this section.

(h) At the discretion of the
 governing board of a school district, this section shall not apply to those employees not requiring certification qualifications who are employed for any period of time less than a school year whose functions do not require frequent or prolonged contact with pupils.

(i) If the governing board of a school district determines by resolution, after hearing, that the health of pupils in the school district would not be jeopardized, this section shall not apply to an employee of the school district who files an affidavit stating that the employee adheres to the faith or teachings of a well-recognized religious sect, denomination, or organization and, in accordance with its creed, tenets, or principles, depends for healing upon prayer in the practice of religion, and that to the best of the employee’s knowledge and belief, the employee is free from infectious
 tuberculosis. If at any time there is probable cause to believe that the affiant is afflicted with infectious tuberculosis, the employee may be excluded from service until the governing board of the school district is satisfied that the employee is not afflicted.

(j) A person who transfers employment from one school or school district to another school or school district shall be deemed to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) if that person can produce a certificate that shows the person was found to be free of infectious tuberculosis within 60 days of initial hire, or the school previously employing the person verifies that the person has a certificate on file showing that the person is free from infectious tuberculosis.

(k) A person who transfers their employment from a private or
 parochial elementary school, secondary school, or nursery school to a school or school district subject to this section shall be deemed to meet the requirements of subdivision (a) if that person can produce a certificate as provided for in Section 121525 of the Health and Safety Code that shows that they were found to be free of infectious tuberculosis within 60 days of initial hire, or if the school previously employing the person verifies that the person has a certificate on file showing that the person is free from infectious tuberculosis.

(l) (1) A governing board, county superintendent of schools, or governing body of a charter school providing for the transportation of pupils under contract authorized by Section 39800, 39801, or any other provision of law shall require as a condition of the
 contract the tuberculosis risk assessment and, if indicated, the examination for infectious tuberculosis within 60 days of initial hire, as provided by subdivision (a), of all drivers transporting pupils for compensation.

(2) At the discretion of the governing board, county superintendent of schools, or governing body of a charter school, paragraph (1) shall not apply to a private contracted driver who transports pupils infrequently and without prolonged contact with the pupils before July 1, 2025.

(m) A volunteer in a school shall also be required to have on file with the school a certificate showing that, upon initial volunteer assignment, the person submitted to a tuberculosis risk assessment and, if tuberculosis risk factors were identified, was examined and found to be free
 of infectious tuberculosis. If no risk factors are identified, an examination is not required. At the discretion of the governing board of a school district, this section shall not apply to a volunteer whose functions do not require frequent or prolonged contact with pupils.

(n) The State Department of Public Health, in consultation with the California Tuberculosis Controllers Association, shall develop a risk assessment questionnaire, to be used to conduct tuberculosis risk assessments pursuant to this section. The risk assessment questionnaire shall be administered by a health care provider, which shall be specified on the questionnaire. This risk assessment questionnaire shall be exempt from the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the
 Government Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 380, Sec. 3.   (SB 88)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

49407.

Notwithstanding any provision of any law, no school district, officer of any school district, school principal, physician, or hospital treating any child enrolled in any school in any district shall be held liable for the reasonable treatment of a child without the consent of a parent or guardian of the child when the child is ill or injured during regular school hours, requires reasonable medical treatment, and the parent or guardian cannot be reached, unless the parent or guardian has previously filed with the school district a written objection to any medical treatment other than first aid.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49408.

For the protection of a pupil’s health and welfare, the governing board of a school district may require the parent or legal guardian of a pupil to keep current at the pupil’s school of attendance, emergency information including the home address and telephone number, business address and telephone number of the parents or guardian, and the name, address and telephone number of a relative or friend who is authorized to care for the pupil in any emergency situation if the parent or legal guardian cannot be reached.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

49409.

Notwithstanding any provision of any law, no physician and surgeon who in good faith and without compensation renders voluntary emergency medical assistance to a participant in a school athletic event or contest at the site thereof, or during transportation to a health care facility, for an injury suffered in the course of the event or contest, shall be liable for any civil damages as a result of any acts or omissions by the physician and surgeon in rendering the emergency medical care. The immunity granted by this paragraph shall not apply in the event of an act or omission constituting gross negligence.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 547.)
-------------------------------------------

49410.

(a) The Legislature finds that:

(1) There is substantial scientific and medical evidence that human exposure to asbestos fibers significantly increases the likelihood of contracting cancer and other debilitating or fatal diseases such as asbestosis.

(2) Medical and epidemiological evidence suggests that children exposed to asbestos fibers may be especially susceptible to the environmentally induced diseases associated with the exposure.

(3) Substantial amounts of asbestos materials were used in school construction during the period from 1946 through 1973 for fireproofing, soundproofing, decoration, and other purposes.

(4) When these materials age, deteriorate, or become damaged or friable, they release asbestos fibers into the ambient air. This can result in the exposure of school children and school employees to potentially dangerous levels of asbestos fibers.

(5) The presence of asbestos in the air in concentrations far exceeding the normal ambient levels has been found in schools, especially where the asbestos materials have reached a damaged, deteriorated, or disturbed state as a result of abuse, abrasion, water leakage, or forced air circulation.

(6) In view of the fact that the State of California has compulsory attendance laws for children of school age, and these children must be educated in a safe and healthy environment, the hazard presented by asbestos materials in the schools is of special concern to the Legislature.

(b) As a result of the findings in subdivision (a), it is the intent of the Legislature to provide for the safe and expeditious containment or removal of asbestos materials posing a hazard to health in schools.

(c) As used in this section and Sections 49410.2 and 49410.5, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Asbestos” means naturally occurring hydrated mineral silicates separable into commercially used fibers: specifically chrysotile, amosite, crocidolite, tremolite, anthrophyllite, and actinolite.

(2) “Asbestos materials” means materials formed by mixing asbestos fibers with other products, including, but not limited to, rock wool, plaster, cellulose, clay, vermiculite, perlite, and a variety of adhesives. Some of these materials may be sprayed on surfaces or applied to surfaces in the form of plaster or a textured paint.

(3) “Hazard to health” means that the asbestos material is loose, friable, flaking, or dusting, or is likely to become so within the service life of the material in place.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1751, Sec. 7.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

49410.2.

School districts and county offices of education may apply to the State Allocation Board pursuant to Section 39619.6 for funds for the purposes of containment or removal of asbestos materials posing a hazard to health.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1751, Sec. 8.   Effective September 30, 1984.)
-------------------------------------------

49410.5.

(a) The State Allocation Board shall retain all information provided by school districts making application for funds pursuant to Sections 39619.6, 39619.7, and 39619.8 regarding the actual or estimated cost of inspection and testing for, and encapsulation or removal of, asbestos.

(b) The Legislature finds and declares that:

(1) Federal moneys may be made available to reimburse schools for costs related to asbestos inspection, testing, encapsulation, and removal, and that the distribution of these moneys will be expedited by the early collection of these data.
